Utah statutes.
58-22-304.   Continuing professional education.

(1)  Each individual licensed as a professional land surveyor shall be required to complete a program of qualifying continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.

(2)  Each individual licensed as a professional engineer or professional structural engineer may be required to complete a program of qualifying continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 259, 1996 General Session

